Hawaii statutes.
ARTICLE 15

INSURERS
SUPERVISION, REHABILITATION AND

LIQUIDATION

Case Notes

Under §§431:15-310 and 431:15-313, the commissioner has
exclusive standing under this article to assert claims arising out of the
liquidation or rehabilitation of an insurance company on behalf of not only the
insolvent insurer, but also its policyholders, creditors, and all other
interested parties. 89 H. 427, 974 P.2d 1017.

This article applies to mutual benefit societies. 99 H. 53,
52 P.3d 823.

PART I.
GENERAL PROVISIONS

§431:15-101 Construction and purpose.
(a) This article shall be cited as the Insurers Supervision, Rehabilitation
and Liquidation Act.

(b) This article shall not be interpreted to
limit the powers granted the commissioner by other provisions in this code.

(c) This article shall be liberally construed
to effect the purpose stated in subsection (d).

(d) The purpose of this article is the
protection of the interests of insureds, claimants, creditors, and the public
generally, with minimum interference with the normal prerogatives of the owners
and managers of insurers, through:

(1) Early detection of any potentially dangerous
condition in an insurer, and prompt application of appropriate corrective
measures;

(2) Improved methods for rehabilitating insurers,
involving the cooperation and management expertise of the insurance industry;

(3) Enhanced efficiency and economy of liquidation,
through clarification of the law, to minimize legal uncertainty and litigation;

(4) Equitable apportionment of any unavoidable loss;

(5) Lessening the problems of interstate
rehabilitation and liquidation by facilitating cooperation between states in
the liquidation process, and by extending the scope of personal jurisdiction
over debtors of the insurer outside this State; and

(6) Regulation of the insurance business by the
impact of the law relating to delinquency procedures and substantive rules on
the entire insurance business. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next